New York, session 2025-2026, S7214.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "college 2 preparation tax credit act". 3 § 2. Section 606 of the tax law is amended by adding a new subsection 4 (qqq) to read as follows: 5 (qqq) College preparation expense credit. (1) General. A resident 6 taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this arti- 7 cle for allowable college preparation expenses. Each taxable year, a 8 credit of up to five hundred dollars per child shall be allowed for 9 qualified college preparation expenses paid or incurred by the taxpayer 10 during such taxable year. No credit shall be allowed for any expenses 11 paid or incurred during the taxable year with respect to any individual 12 for whom an election is not in effect under this subsection for such 13 taxable year. An election may not be made for any taxable year if such 14 an election is in effect with respect to such individual for any three 15 prior taxable years. 16 (2) Qualified college preparation expenses. For purposes of this 17 subsection, the term "qualified college preparation expenses" means 18 amounts paid or incurred for: 19 (a) fees required for taking any advanced placement or international 20 baccalaureate exam; 21 (b) fees required for taking the SAT, the ACT, or any SAT subject 22 test; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11443-01-5 S. 7214 2 1 (c) expenses related to preparation including tutorial services and 2 preparation classes for any exam described in subparagraph (a) or (b) of 3 this paragraph; 4 (d) fees and expenses related to applications for admission to pursue 5 a postsecondary course of study at an eligible educational institution; 6 and 7 (e) such other similar expenses and fees as the commissioner may by 8 regulation prescribe. 9 (3) Treatment of expenses paid by dependent. If a deduction under this 10 subsection with respect to an individual is allowed to another taxpayer 11 for a taxable year beginning in the calendar year in which such individ- 12 ual's taxable year begins: 13 (a) no credit shall be allowed under paragraph one of this subsection 14 to such individual for such individual's taxable year; and 15 (b) qualified college preparation expenses paid by such individual 16 during such individual's taxable year shall be treated for purposes of 17 this subsection as paid by such other taxpayer. 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.